Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-3304] Program administration.
(a) The University of Hawaii shall monitor and verify a student's fulfillment
of all requirements for a scholarship grant under this program.

(b) The University of Hawaii may enter into a
contract with a private or public entity to administer the program.

(c) The University of Hawaii shall enforce
repayment of all scholarship grants if a student does not comply with the
requirements of the scholarship grant. Enforcement shall include the use of
all lawful collection procedures, including private collection agencies.

(d) Scholarship grants received by a student
under the program shall not be considered taxable income under chapter 235.

(e) Scholarship grants received by a student
under the program shall not be considered financial assistance or
appropriations to the approved educational institution.

(f) Any person who knowingly or intentionally
procures, obtains, or aids another to procure or obtain a scholarship grant
under the program through fraudulent means shall be disqualified from
participation in the program and shall be liable to the University of Hawaii
for an amount equal to three times the amount obtained. [L 2006, c 75, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next